Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Supplement, 202526-108
Hearing; notice to respondent.

(1)(a) If a domestic abuse protection order or sexual assault protection order is not issued or renewed ex parte under section 26-109, the court shall immediately schedule an evidentiary hearing to be held within fourteen days after the filing of the petition, and the court shall cause notice of the application to be given to the respondent stating that the respondent may show cause why such order should not be entered.

(b) If a harassment protection order is not issued or renewed ex parte under section 26-109, the court may schedule an evidentiary hearing to be held within fourteen days after the filing of the petition, and in such case the court shall cause notice of the application to be given to the respondent stating that the respondent may show cause why such order should not be entered.

(2) Any notice provided to the respondent shall include notification that:

(a) A court may treat a petition for a domestic abuse, harassment, or sexual assault protection order as a petition for another of such types of order if it appears from the facts that such other protection order is more appropriate; and

(b) The respondent shall have an opportunity to show cause as to why such protection order should not be entered.

Laws 2025, LB80, § 8.